Mississippi statutes. Title 67. Alcoholic Beverages
Chapter 1. Local Option Alcoholic Beverage Control
§ 67-1-63.
Permit renewals; continued operation after denial of renewal under certain circumstances; appeals.

Any permittee may renew his permit at the expiration thereof for an additional term of one (1) year, provided he is then qualified to receive a permit and the premises for which the renewal is sought are suitable for such purposes. The renewal privilege herein provided for shall not be construed as a vested right. No “on-premises” retailer’s permit shall be renewed at the expiration thereof for any “hotel” or “restaurant” under this chapter unless the commission is satisfied that the holder thereof is continuing to meet the requirements of a hotel or restaurant, as defined in Section 67-1-5.

When an application for the renewal of a permit has been denied by the department for a reason other than for being incomplete, for failure to pay any applicable license privilege taxes or fees required for renewal or for failure to post a bond, cash or securities as required by Section 27-71-21, the permittee shall be allowed to continue to operate under the permit for which renewal was denied until the last of the following dates:

The date on which the permit expires;

The date on which the time period for filing an appeal of the denial of the renewal to the Board of Tax Appeals expires;

If the denial is timely appealed to the Board of Tax Appeals and this appeal is later withdrawn, the date on which the withdrawal of appeal occurs; or

If the denial is timely appealed to the Board of Tax Appeals and an order is entered by the Board of Tax Appeals affirming the denial of the renewal, the date on which the permittee receives notice of the decision of the Board of Tax Appeals affirming the denial.Refusal to accept delivery of such notice or the posting of the final decision of the Board of Tax Appeals at the permitted place of business shall constitute receipt of notice by the permittee of this decision.

If the denial of an application for renewal of a permit is appealed to the Board of Tax Appeals and the board reverses the denial of the application for renewal, the department shall renew and issue the permit from its last expiration date.

The issuance and/or renewal of a permit based on the decision of the Board of Tax Appeals shall not bar or estop the department from appealing this decision of the Board of Tax Appeals to chancery court under Section 67-1-39.Any subsequent renewal of this permit while an appeal by the department from the decision of the Board of Tax Appeals is pending shall be subject to the final decision of the court on this appeal.If in such an appeal by the department, a court enters a final decision and/or order reversing the decision of the board and affirming the denial of the application for a permit or the application for renewal of a permit, the permit, even if subsequently renewed, shall be deemed denied and not authorize the permittee to sell alcoholic beverages under that permit after the date on which the decision and/or order of the court affirming the denial of the permit becomes final and not subject to any further appeal.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-22; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 22; Laws, 1986, ch. 486, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 133, eff from and after July 1, 2010.

§ 67-1-65.
Issuance of permits in counties having no incorporated municipality.

In any county having heretofore voted, or which hereafter votes, to come out from under the prohibition law, in which there is not located an incorporated municipality within such county, the state tax commission may issue package retailer’s permits in such county.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-23.5; Laws, 1968, ch. 595, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved June 27, 1968).

§ 67-1-67.
Transfer of permit.

No permit shall be transferred by the permittee to any other person or any other place except with the written consent of the commission upon a regular application therefor in writing and upon consideration thereof as provided in this chapter for an original application for a permit. The commission shall not approve the transfer of the permit of any person against whom there is pending in the courts or before the commission any charge of keeping a disorderly house, or of violating this chapter or the laws against gambling in this state or against whom there is pending any proceedings for the revocation, suspension or cancellation of the permit.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-24; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 24, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 67-1-69.
Permittees must comply with federal statutes.

No person holding any permit issued under the provisions of this chapter shall engage in any business or activity authorized by such permit unless such person shall qualify so to do by complying with all statutes of the United States of America, and all regulations issued pursuant thereto, which are applicable or shall pertain to such business or activity, and shall continue to be so qualified at all times while engaging in such business or activity. As a prerequisite to the issuance of any permit under this chapter, the applicant shall first obtain the required federal occupational stamp for the type of business for which the permit has been approved by the commission.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-29; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 29, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 67-1-71.
Suspension and revocation of permits; reasonable notice of charges for which suspension or revocation is sought; hearing before Board of Tax Appeals; applicability of paragraph (i) to games or lotteries authorized by Mississippi lottery law.

The department may revoke or suspend any permit issued by it for a violation by the permittee of any of the provisions of this chapter or of the regulations promulgated under it by the department.

Permits must be revoked or suspended for the following causes:

Conviction of the permittee for the violation of any of the provisions of this chapter;

Willful failure or refusal by any permittee to comply with any of the provisions of this chapter or of any rule or regulation adopted pursuant thereto;

The making of any materially false statement in any application for a permit;

Conviction of one or more of the clerks, agents or employees of the permittee, of any violation of this chapter upon the premises covered by such permit within a period of time as designated by the rules or regulations of the department;

The possession on the premises of any retail permittee of any alcoholic beverages upon which the tax has not been paid;

The willful failure of any permittee to keep the records or make the reports required by this chapter, or to allow an inspection of such records by any duly authorized person;

The suspension or revocation of a permit issued to the permittee by the federal government, or conviction of violating any federal law relating to alcoholic beverages;

The failure to furnish any bond required by Section 27-71-21 within fifteen (15) days after notice from the department; and

The conducting of any form of illegal gambling on the premises of any permittee or on any premises connected therewith or the presence on any such premises of any gambling device with the knowledge of the permittee.

The provisions of paragraph (i) of this section shall not apply to gambling or the presence of any gambling devices, with knowledge of the permittee, on board a cruise vessel in the waters within the State of Mississippi, which lie adjacent to the State of Mississippi south of the three (3) most southern counties in the State of Mississippi, or on any vessel as defined in Section 27-109-1 whenever such vessel is on the Mississippi River or navigable waters within any county bordering on the Mississippi River. The department may, in its discretion, issue on-premises retailer’s permits to a common carrier of the nature described in this paragraph.

The provisions of paragraph (i) of this section shall not apply to the operation of any game or lottery authorized by Chapter 115, Title 27.

No permit shall be suspended or revoked until after the permittee has been provided reasonable notice of the charges against him for which suspension or revocation is sought and the opportunity to a hearing before the Board of Tax Appeals to contest such charges and the suspension or revocation proposed. Opportunity to a hearing is provided without an actual hearing if the permittee, after receiving reasonable notice, including notice of his right to a hearing, fails to timely request a hearing. The permittee may also at any time waive his rights to reasonable notice and/or to the opportunity to a hearing by agreeing to a suspension or revocation offered by the department. Notwithstanding the requirement above that a permit may not be suspended without notice and opportunity to a hearing, sales of alcoholic beverages by a permittee under a permit for which the bond under Section 27-71-21 has been cancelled shall be suspended from and after issuance of the notice provided in paragraph (h) above and shall continue to be suspended until the bond is reinstated, a new bond is posted or sufficient cash or securities as provided under Section 27-71-21 are deposited with the State Treasurer for this permit.

In addition to the causes specified in this section and other provisions of this chapter, the department shall be authorized to suspend the permit of any permit holder for being out of compliance with an order for support, as defined in Section 93-11-153. The procedure for suspension of a permit for being out of compliance with an order for support, and the procedure for the reissuance or reinstatement of a permit suspended for that purpose, and the payment of any fees for the reissuance or reinstatement of a permit suspended for that purpose, shall be governed by Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be. If there is any conflict between any provision of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163 and any provision of this chapter, the provisions of Section 93-11-157 or 93-11-163, as the case may be, shall control.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-28; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 28; Laws, 1989, ch. 310, § 1; Laws, 1989, ch. 480, § 8; Laws, 1990, ch. 449, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 573, § 6; Laws, 1990 Ex Sess, ch. 45 § 146; Laws, 1992, ch. 459, § 2; Laws, 1996, ch. 507, § 17; Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 134; Laws, 2010, ch. 388, § 13, eff from and after July 1, 2010; Laws, 2018, 1st Ex Sess, ch. 2, § 52, eff from and after September 1, 2018.

§ 67-1-72.
Appeal to Board of Tax Appeals from certain actions of the Department of Revenue; notice of hearing; order.

Except as otherwise provided in this chapter, any applicant or holder of a permit issued under this chapter which is aggrieved by an action of the Department of Revenue to deny his application for a permit, to deny the renewal of his permit or to revoke or suspend his permit shall be allowed to appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals from this action. This appeal is to be filed by the aggrieved person with the Executive Director of the Board of Tax Appeals, with a copy being sent to the Department of Revenue, within fifteen (15) days from the date that person received notice of the action of the department being aggrieved. If the person aggrieved fails to appeal within this fifteen-day period, the action of the Department of Revenue shall take effect as set out in the notice. The Department of Revenue retains the authority to change at any time the action aggrieved to in an appeal under this subsection. The applicant or holder of any permit issued under this chapter may waive his right to notice and opportunity to a hearing as provided by this subsection and agree to the action being taken by the department. The inability of the Department of Revenue to issue or renew a permit due to an incomplete application or due to the failure of the applicant to pay the annual privilege taxes and fees provided by Section 27-71-5 and/or the failure of the applicant to post or deposit the bond, cash or securities as required by Section 27-71-21 shall not constitute a denial for purposes of this subsection.

Any applicant for approval as a manager of an establishment operating under a permit issued under this chapter or who holds the designation of an approved manager of an establishment operating under a permit issued under this chapter and who is aggrieved by an action of the Department of Revenue to deny his application for approval as a manager or to revoke or suspend his designation as an approved manager shall be allowed to appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals from this action. This appeal is to be filed by the aggrieved person with the Executive Director of the Board of Tax Appeals, with a copy being sent to the Department of Revenue, within fifteen (15) days from the date that person received notice of the action of the department being aggrieved. If the person aggrieved fails to appeal within this fifteen-day period, the action of the Department of Revenue shall take effect as set out in the notice. The Department of Revenue retains the authority to change at any time the action aggrieved to in an appeal under this subsection. The applicant or holder of an approved manager designation may waive his right to notice and opportunity to a hearing as provided by this subsection and agree to the action being taken by the department. The inability of the Department of Revenue to consider an application for approval of an applicant as a manager due to an incomplete application shall not constitute a denial of the application for purposes of this subsection.

Any applicant for approval of an area or locality as a qualified resort area under this chapter who is aggrieved by the decision of the Department of Revenue to deny the qualified resort area as requested and any county or municipality wherein the proposed qualified resort area is located may appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals from such decision. This appeal is to be filed by the aggrieved applicant or by the affected county or municipality with the Executive Director of the Board of Tax Appeals, with a copy being sent to the Department of Revenue, within fifteen (15) days from the date that the person or entity filing the appeal received notice of the decision of the Department of Revenue to deny the qualified resort area. If an appeal is not filed within this fifteen-day period, the decision of the Department of Revenue shall become final. The Department of Revenue retains the authority to change at any time the decision aggrieved to in an appeal under this subsection. The inability of the Department of Revenue to consider an application for the approval of an area or locality as a qualified resort area due to an incomplete application shall not constitute a denial of that application for purposes of this subsection.

Any person, including any county or municipality in which the qualified resort area is located, who is aggrieved by the decision of the Department of Revenue to revoke the approval of an area or locality as a qualified resort area may appeal to the Board of Tax Appeals from such decision. This appeal is to be filed by the aggrieved person with the Executive Director of the Board of Tax Appeals, with a copy being sent to the Department of Revenue, within fifteen (15) days from the date that the person or entity filing the appeal received notice of the decision of the department to revoke approval of the qualified resort area. At the discretion of the Department of Revenue, in addition to any other notice to be provided under this subsection, the department may provide notice of its decision to revoke approval of the qualified resort area by publication in the same manner as provided by regulation when approval of a qualified resort area is sought. In regard to such publication, the fifteen-day period provided herein will begin on the date that notice is first published. If an appeal is not filed within this fifteen-day period, the decision of the Department of Revenue shall become final. The Department of Revenue retains the authority to change at any time the decision aggrieved to in an appeal under this subsection.

Any person objecting to an application for the issuance or transfer of a permit, other than a temporary retailer’s permit, issued under this chapter and who timely requests in writing a hearing on his objection shall be given a hearing before the Board of Tax Appeals unless the permit is denied by the Department of Revenue and an appeal is not taken by the applicant to the Board of Tax Appeals from that denial or the applicant withdraws his application. Any written request for a hearing on an objection must be filed with the Department of Revenue within fifteen (15) days from the first date of publication of the notice of such application under Section 67-1-53. If the department determines that the permit should be denied, notice will be provided to the applicant as set out in subsection (1) of this section, and if the applicant timely requests a hearing on the denial as provided by this subsection (5), the department will advise the Executive Director of the Board of Tax Appeals and the applicant of the written request for a hearing on an objection to the permit. The hearing on the objection to the permit and the hearing on the appeal by the applicant from the denial of the department of the application shall be consolidated and heard by the Board of Tax Appeals at the same time. If the department determines that the permit should be issued, the department will advise the applicant and the Executive Director of the Board of Tax Appeals of the timely written request for a hearing on an objection to the application and a hearing will be set before the Board of Tax Appeals on this objection. If prior to the hearing, either the person requesting the hearing withdraws his request or the applicant withdraws his application, the hearing will be cancelled and the objection proceedings before the Board of Tax Appeals on the application will be dismissed as moot. In the case of such withdrawals, the Board of Tax Appeals is authorized to assess to either or both parties any costs incurred by it prior to such withdrawal. The Department of Revenue retains authority to issue the permit to the applicant where the person objecting to the application withdraws his request for a hearing.

Any person objecting to an application for approval by the Department of Revenue of a area or locality as a qualified resort area under this chapter and who timely requests in writing a hearing on his objection shall be given a hearing before the Board of Tax Appeals unless approval of the application is denied by the Department of Revenue and an appeal is not taken by the applicant or the county or municipality in which the proposed qualified resort area is located to the Board of Tax Appeals from that denial or the applicant withdraws his application. Any written request for a hearing on an objection must be filed with the Department of Revenue within fifteen (15) days from the first date of publication of the notice of such application as provided by regulation. If the department determines that the application for approval of the proposed area or locality as a qualified resort area should be denied, the department will proceed with denial of such application as set out in subsection (3) of this section, and if the applicant or the county or municipality in which the proposed qualified resort area is located timely requests a hearing on the denial as provided by subsection (3) of this section, the department will advise the Executive Director of the Board of Tax Appeals and the applicant of the written request for a hearing on an objection to the application. The hearing on the objection to approval of the proposed qualified resort area and the hearing on the appeal from the denial of the department of the application for such approval shall be consolidated and heard by the Board of Tax Appeals at the same time. If the department determines that the proposed qualified resort area should be approved, the department will advise the applicant and the Executive Director of the Board of Tax Appeals of the timely written request for a hearing on an objection to the application and a hearing will be set before the Board of Tax Appeals on this objection. If prior to the hearing, either the person requesting the hearing withdraws his request or the applicant withdraws his application, the hearing will be cancelled and the objection proceedings before the Board of Tax Appeals on the application will be dismissed as moot. In the case of such withdrawals, the Board of Tax Appeals is authorized to assess to either or both parties any costs incurred by it prior to such withdrawal. The Department of Revenue retains authority to approve the proposed area or locality as a qualified resort area where the person objecting to the application withdraws his request for a hearing.

Any person having an interest in any alcoholic beverages, light wine, beer or raw materials which the Department of Revenue intends to dispose of under Section 67-1-18 shall be given reasonable notice of this proposed disposal, and upon such notice, this person may request a hearing before the Board of Tax Appeals to establish his right or claim to this property. This request for a hearing shall be filed with the Board of Tax Appeals, with a copy sent to the Department of Revenue, within fifteen (15) days from the date of receipt of the notice provided above by the person filing the request. If a request is not received by the Board of Tax Appeals within this fifteen-day period, the department may order the property disposed of in accordance with Section 67-1-18.

Upon receipt of a written request for hearing or appeal as set out above, the executive director shall schedule a hearing before the Board of Tax Appeals on this request or appeal. A notice of the hearing shall be mailed to all persons or entities having an interest in the matter being heard which shall always include the person or entity filing the request or appeal for which the hearing is being set, the applicant or holder of any permit, approved manager status or qualified resort area status in issue, any person who filed a written request for a hearing on an objection to any application in issue and the Department of Revenue. This notice shall provide the date, time and location of the hearing. Mailing to the attorney representing a person or entity in the matter being heard shall be the same as mailing to the person or entity the attorney represents. Failure of the person or entity on whose request or appeal the matter was set for hearing to appear personally or through his designated representative at the hearing shall constitute an involuntary withdrawal of his request or appeal. Upon such withdrawal, the Board of Tax Appeals shall note on the record the failure of the person or entity to appear at the hearing and shall dismiss the request or appeal and remand the matter back to the Department of Revenue for appropriate action.

At any hearing before the Board of Tax Appeals on an appeal or hearing request as set out above, two (2) members of the Board of Tax Appeals shall constitute a quorum. At the hearing, the Board of Tax Appeals shall try the issues presented according to law and the facts and pursuant to any guidelines established by regulation. The rules of evidence shall be relaxed at the hearing and the hearing shall be recorded by a court reporter. After reaching a decision on the issues presented, the Board of Tax Appeals shall enter an order setting forth its findings and decision in the matter. A copy of the order of the Board of Tax Appeals shall be mailed to the person or entity filing the request or appeal which was heard, the applicant or holder of any permit, approved manager status or qualified resort area status in issue, any person who filed a written request for a hearing on an objection to any application in issue and the Department of Revenue to notify them of the findings and decision of the Board of Tax Appeals.

HISTORY:
Laws, 2009, ch. 492, § 135; Laws, 2010, ch. 388, § 14; Laws, 2015, ch. 438, § 3, eff from and after passage (approved Apr. 13, 2015).

§ 67-1-73.
Records and reports; penalty.

Every manufacturer, including native wine producers, within or without the state, and every other shipper of alcoholic beverages who sells any alcoholic beverage, including native wine, within the state, shall, at the time of making such sale, file with the commission a copy of the invoice of such sale showing in detail the kind of alcoholic beverage sold, the quantities of each, the size of the container and the weight of the contents, the alcoholic content, and the name and address of the person to whom sold.

Every person transporting alcoholic beverages, including native wine, within this state to a point within this state, whether such transportation originates within or without this state, shall, within five (5) days after delivery of such shipment, furnish the commission a copy of the bill of lading or receipt, showing the name or consignor or consignee, date, place received, destination, and quantity of alcoholic beverages delivered. Upon failure to comply with the provisions of this section, such person shall be deemed guilty of a misdemeanor and upon conviction thereof shall be fined in the sum of Fifty Dollars ($50.00) for each offense.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-30; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 30; Laws, 1976, ch. 467, § 19, eff from and after passage (approved May 25, 1976).

§ 67-1-75.
Offenses by holder of package retailer’s permit or by employee thereof; penalty.

If the holder of a package retailer’s permit, or any employee thereof:

Shall sell, offer for sale or permit to be sold in, on or about the premises covered by such permit any alcoholic beverages except in the original sealed and unopened packages; or

Shall permit the drinking or consumption of any alcoholic beverages in, on or about the premises covered by such permit except as may be otherwise authorized by this chapter; or

Shall sell, offer for sale or permit the sale in, on or about the premises of alcoholic beverages in any package or container containing less than fifty (50) milliliters by liquid measure; then such person or employee shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term of not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court. In addition, in the case of the commission of any of such offenses by the holder of a permit, it shall be the duty of the commission forthwith to revoke the permit held by such person and conviction of the criminal offense shall not be a condition precedent to such revocation.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-25; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 25; Laws, 1977, ch. 418; Laws, 1988, ch. 383, § 3; Laws, 2014, ch. 516, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 2014.

§ 67-1-77.
Financial interest prohibition; exceptions; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for the holder of a manufacturer’s or wholesaler’s permit, or anyone connected with the business of such holder, or for any other distiller, wine manufacturer, rectifier, blender or bottler, to have any financial interest in any premises upon which any alcoholic beverage is sold at retail by any permittee, or in the business conducted by such permittee, except that:

The holder of a manufacturer’s or wholesaler’s permit may contract for the service of a representative in the area of governmental affairs on a part-time basis with a holder of an on-premises permit.

A distiller, wine manufacturer, rectifier, blender or bottler may have a financial interest in a premises upon which alcoholic beverages are sold at retail by a permittee, or in the business conducted by a permittee, if the permittee does not sell or serve any alcoholic beverages that are distilled, manufactured, rectified, blended or bottled by the distiller, wine manufacturer, rectifier, blender or bottler having the financial interest in the premises or in the business conducted by a permittee.

A distiller, wine manufacturer, rectifier, blender or bottler may have a financial interest in and possess a distillery retailer’s permit.

It shall also be unlawful for any such person, or anyone connected with his, its, or their business to lend any money or make any gift or offer any gratuity, to any retail permittee, except as authorized by regulations of the commission, to the holder of any retail permit issued under the provisions of this chapter. Except as above provided, no retail permittee shall accept, receive, or make use of any money or gift furnished by any such person, or become indebted to such person except for the purchase of alcoholic beverages.

The commission shall not prohibit the furnishing of advertising specialties, printed materials, or other things having nominal value to a retail permittee. This section shall not be construed to prohibit the possession by any person of advertising specialties, printed materials, or other things having nominal value furnished by a retail permittee.

Any person violating the provisions of this section shall, upon conviction, be punished by a fine of not more than Five Thousand Dollars ($5,000.00) or by imprisonment for not more than two (2) years, or by both such fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-26; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 26; Laws, 1985, ch. 422; Laws, 1986, ch. 450, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 361, § 1; Laws, 2007, ch. 302, § 1, eff from and after passage (approved Jan. 31, 2007); Laws, 2018, ch. 453, § 2, eff from and after July 1, 2018.

§ 67-1-79.
Credit to retailers prohibited.

No alcoholic beverage shall be sold by any wholesaler to any retailer, nor shall any retailer purchase any alcoholic beverage, except for cash. Each delivery of any alcoholic beverage to a retail permittee shall be accompanied by an invoice of sale or delivery slip which shall bear as its date the date of delivery of such alcoholic beverage.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-27; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 27, eff from and after July 1, 1966.

§ 67-1-81.
Sales to minors prohibited; penalties.

Any permittee or other person who shall sell, furnish, dispose of, give, or cause to be sold, furnished, disposed of, or given, any alcoholic beverage to any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) nor more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) for a first offense. For a second or subsequent offense, such permittee or other person shall be punished by a fine of not less than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) nor more than Two Thousand Dollars ($2,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than one (1) year, or by both such fine and imprisonment in the discretion of the court. Upon conviction of a second offense under the provisions of this section the permit of any permittee so convicted shall be automatically and permanently revoked.

Any person under the age of twenty-one (21) years who purchases, receives, or has in his or her possession in any public place, any alcoholic beverages, shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00). Provided, that clearing or busing tables that have glasses or other containers that contain or did contain alcoholic beverages, or stocking, bagging or otherwise handling purchases of alcoholic beverages shall not be deemed possession of alcoholic beverages for the purposes of this section. Provided further, that a person who is at least eighteen (18) years of age but under the age of twenty-one (21) years who waits on tables by taking orders for or delivering orders of alcoholic beverages shall not be deemed to unlawfully possess or furnish alcoholic beverages if in the scope of his employment by the holder of an on-premises retailer’s permit. This exception shall not authorize a person under the age of twenty-one (21) to tend bar or act in the capacity of bartender. Any person under the age of twenty-one (21) who knowingly makes a false statement to the effect that he or she is twenty-one (21) years old or older or presents any document that indicates he or she is twenty-one (21) years of age or older for the purpose of purchasing alcoholic beverages from any person engaged in the sale of alcoholic beverages shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not less than Two Hundred Dollars ($200.00) nor more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00), and a sentence to not more than thirty (30) days’ community service.

The term “community service” as used in this section shall mean work, projects or services for the benefit of the community assigned, supervised and recorded by appropriate public officials.

If a person under the age of twenty-one (21) years is convicted or enters a plea of guilty of purchasing, receiving or having in his or her possession in any public place any alcoholic beverages in violation of subsection (2) of this section, the trial judge, in lieu of the penalties otherwise provided under subsection (2) of this section, shall suspend the minor’s driver’s license by taking and keeping it in the custody of the court for a period of time not to exceed ninety (90) days. The judge so ordering the suspension shall enter upon his docket “DEFENDANT’S DRIVER’S LICENSE SUSPENDED FOR_______________DAYS IN LIEU OF CONVICTION” and such action by the trial judge shall not constitute a conviction. During the period that the minor’s driver’s license is suspended, the trial judge shall suspend the imposition of any fines or penalties that may be imposed under subsection (2) of this section and may place the minor on probation subject to such conditions as the judge deems appropriate. If the minor violates any of the conditions of probation, then the trial judge shall return the driver’s license to the minor and impose the fines, penalties or both, that he would have otherwise imposed, and such action shall constitute a conviction.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-31; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 31; Laws, 1979, ch. 380; Laws, 1992, ch. 460, § 1; Laws, 2009, ch. 350, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2009.

§ 67-1-83.
Other prohibited sales; penalty.

It shall be unlawful for any permittee or other person to sell or furnish any alcoholic beverage to any person who is visibly intoxicated, or to any person who is known to habitually drink alcoholic beverages to excess, or to any person who is known to be an habitual user of narcotics or other habit-forming drugs. It shall also be unlawful for the holder of any package retailer’s permit to sell any alcoholic beverages except by delivery in person to the purchaser at the place of business of the permittee.

It shall be unlawful for any permittee or other person to sell or furnish any alcoholic beverage to any person to whom the commission has, after investigation, decided to prohibit the sale of those beverages because of an appeal to the commission so to do by the husband, wife, father, mother, brother, sister, child, or employer of the person. The interdiction in those cases shall last until removed by the commission, but no person shall be held to have violated this subsection unless he has been informed by the commission, by registered letter, that it is forbidden to sell to that individual or unless that fact is otherwise known to the permittee or other person.

It shall be unlawful for any holder of a package retailer’s permit, or any employee or agent thereof, engaged solely in the business of package retail sales under this chapter to sell or furnish any alcoholic beverage before 10:00 a.m. and after 10:00 p.m. or to sell alcoholic beverages on Sunday and Christmas Day.

Any person who violates any of the provisions of this section shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and, upon conviction, shall be punished by a fine of not more than Five Hundred Dollars ($500.00) or by imprisonment in the county jail for a term of not more than six (6) months or by both that fine and imprisonment, in the discretion of the court. In addition, the commission shall immediately revoke the permit of any permittee who violates the provisions of this section.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-32; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 32; Laws, 1972, ch. 508, § 1; Laws, 1977, ch. 485; Laws, 1986, ch. 486, § 2; Laws, 1989, ch. 384, § 2; Laws, 2008, ch. 442, § 18, eff from and after July 1, 2008.

§ 67-1-85.
Regulation of advertising and display of alcoholic beverages.

The holder of a package retailer’s permit may have signs, lighted or otherwise, on the outside of the premises covered by his permit which advertise, announce or advise of the sale of alcoholic beverages in or on said premises. Wherever the sign is located on the premises, the name of the business shall also include the permit number thereof, preceded by the words “A.B.C. Permit No.”

It shall be lawful to advertise alcoholic beverages by means of signs, billboards or displays on or along any road, highway, street or building.

It shall be lawful for publishers, broadcasters and other kinds, types or forms of public and private advertising media to advertise alcoholic beverages; however, no alcoholic beverages may be advertised during, or within five (5) minutes preceding or following, any television broadcast which consists primarily of animated material intended for viewing by young children.

Notwithstanding the provisions of this section to the contrary, it shall be unlawful to advertise alcoholic beverages by means of signs, billboards or displays in any municipality, county or judicial district which has not voted pursuant to the provisions of this chapter to legalize the sale of alcoholic beverages.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-33; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 33; Laws, 1968, ch. 592, § 1; Laws, 1971, ch. 350, § 1; Laws, 1982, ch. 419; Laws, 1986, ch. 450, § 1; Laws, 1988, ch. 562, § 2; Laws, 1990, ch. 569, § 5; Laws, 2017, ch. 393, § 1, eff from and after July 1, 2017.

§ 67-1-87.
General penalty provision.

Any person convicted of a violation of any of the provisions of this chapter for which no other penalty is specifically provided herein shall be guilty of a misdemeanor and shall be punished by a fine of not more than One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00), or by imprisonment for not more than six (6) months, or by both such fine and imprisonment.

Any person convicted of a violation of any rules or regulations promulgated by the commission under the authority of this chapter shall be subject to a civil penalty to be assessed by the commission in an amount not to exceed One Thousand Dollars ($1,000.00) to be deposited into the State General Fund.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-38; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 38; Laws, 1992, ch. 459, § 3, eff from and after July 1, 1992.

§ 67-1-89.
Injunctive relief.

In addition to any other rights and remedies which it may have, the commission, in the name of the chairman thereof, shall have the right to resort to and apply for injunctive relief, both temporary and permanent, in any court of competent jurisdiction to enforce compliance with the provisions of this chapter and to restrain and prevent violations and threatened violations thereof. The Attorney General, district attorneys and county attorneys of this state, shall aid and assist the commission in all such actions when requested by the chairman so to do.

HISTORY:
Codes, 1942, § 10265-34; Laws, 1966, ch. 540, § 34, eff from and after July 1, 1966.